NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/en_GB/hyph_en_GB.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
1'.
1's./'=s,1,2
1't./'=t,1,2
1’.
1’s./’=s,1,2
1’t./’=t,1,2
NEXTLEVEL
.1ab
.ab4i
.abo2
.ab3ol
.ace4
.ace2t3
.a2ch4
.a2ct
.ac2t1iv
.ac5t2iva
.ad1d4
.ad3di
.ad4d1in
.ad3e
.a2d3o
.4a2e5d
.aer1
.aer3i
.a2f3f
.a2ﬀ
.a2f3t
.ag4a
.4a2g5n2
.2ai2
.a2ir3
.al5im
.4al1k
.all2
.al3le
.2a2m
.a1m5a2r
.am1at
.ama5te
.am2i
.am2p
.am3pe
.am3ph
.a2n1
.an2a
.an1a3b
.an2a3s
.a4nd2
.an5da
.an4el
.a4n4en
.a4ng
.an4gl2
.an1o
.an4on.
.a4n3s
.an2t3a
.an3t2i3
.4ant4ic
.an4t5o
.a2n2y5
.2ap
.a1pho
.a3ph5or
.ap4i
.a2r
.ar5ab
.ar5ap
.ar1c2
.ar4c2i2
.ar5d
.ar4e
.ar1i4
.ar4ise
.ar4isi
.a2r2s2
.ar2se
.ar5sen
.art2
.ar1t4ic
.ar4t5icl2
.as1
.as4q
.a4ss2
.as5s1ib
.2a2ta
.at5a2r
.ate2l
.ateli4
.a2to
.at2om
.atom1i
.at5omi4se
.at5om1iz
.2a2t3r2
.a2t3t4
.2au2
.au3b
.au3g4u
.au4r
.aur4e5
.aus5
.au3th
.authe2
.authen5
.2av4
.aver1
.av5era
.b2a4p1
.ba2pt2
.bap2t1is
.bap5ti2s1m4
.ba2r
.b2a4r1r4
.bar3ri
.barri5c4
.1bas
.bas4i
.ba5sic
.b2e
.2b2ed
.be3d2i
.1bel
.be3lo
.ber1
.be5r4a
.be1s2
.be5s1m4
.b4ie2
.bi4er1
.2bl2
.bl2a
.b4l2az2
.blaz5o
.bo2
.bo3lo
.bo1s5o2m
.bo4u2
.b2oun1
.bou4n4d
.bov4
.br4
.3bra5ch
.br2e2
.bu4r
.bur2n2
.burn5i
.ca3de
.ca1g2i
.ca4gin
.c2a2m
.cam5i
.ca1m3o
.ca2n1
.can5t2a
.1c2ap
.cap1i
.ca5p2itu
.1ca2r
.car4i
.3cas1u3
.cas2ua2
.cas5u1al
.c1at
.ca4ti
.1cen2
.ce4n2s
.cen5so
.3cent
.cen1te
.cen5ten1a
.cen1tr2
.cen4t5ri
.cer1
.cer4i
.2ch4
.1c2i2
.cit4a
.cl2
.c2le2
.cle1m5e4
.cli1m
.clima5to
.1c2o2
.c2oi
.co5i4t
.co3pa
.co1pr2
.cop5ro
.c4o3r1u
.co3si
.c2ot
.co5ter1
.5coty
.coty3le5
.cr2
.crit1ic
.cri5t2i1c2i2
.1cus
.c4ust2
.cus1to4
.cust2om5
.3d2av5
.dea2
.dea5c2o2
.d2ele
.de5lec
.del5eg
.de3li
.de3l2i5r
.1d4e1m
.den1i
.de5nit
.de3n1o
.der2
.de3ra
.d4er2e
.de5re4s
.1de3ri
.5de2sc2
.descr2
.de5sc2r2ib
.deser1
.de5ser1v2
.des4i
.des2i4g
.desi2gn2
.de5signe
.de5s2ir
.de5s1is2
.des1p
.des2po
.de5sp2oi
.1de1t
.deter2
.determ5i
.de3ve
.de4w
.1d2i1a2
.di4al.
.dia3s
.di4at
.2d1in
.din4a
.3d2i1o2
.di2o5c
.1do2
.do4e
.d2om
.dom2e
.do2me2s
.domest5
.1du
.d2ua2
.du1al
.du4al.
.3d4u4c
.2d2y
.d4y2s3
.ea2
.eas4t5
.e2ch
.ech3i
.ech1in5
.e1c2o3
.e2c3t
.2ed
.ede2
.e1d5em
.ed1it
.ed4it.
.ed4iti
.eg4
.ei3d4
.e2i5r
.2ele
.e2l3ev3
.el2i
.e1lu
.elu5s4
.e2m3b
.em5in
.em1p4
.em5p4y
.en1
.en5c
.2e4nd
.ende2
.en4d2ed
.e4n3s
.ent2
.en5ta
.eo1s5
.epi1
.epi3d
.er1
.er2a
.2er2e
.er5em5
.er4i4
.er4o2
.eros4
.er2ot3
.e4r1r4
.er4ri
.es1
.e2sc2
.es1ca
.esc1al5
.es3p
.es3t2
.eter2
.eter2n5
.e2th1
.eth3e2
.eu1
.eu4r4
.eval3
.e1vo
.evo2l
.evol5ut
.ew4
.ex1
.ex3a
.eye3
.1f2a
.fall2
.fal4le
.5fa2r
.far4i
.3fec
.fecun1
.fecu4nd
.fec5un2da
.f2e4n4d
.feof2
.feo2ff5
.feo2ﬀ
.feoﬁ
.feoﬂ2
.fi2
.ﬁ2
.1fi2l
.fi5l2i1a2
.1ﬁ2l
.ﬁ5l2i1a2
.fil5tr2
.ﬁl5tr2
.2fin
.fin2e
.fine4s
.fi1n5e4ss
.2ﬁn
.ﬁn2e
.ﬁne4s
.ﬁ1n5e4ss
.f1i4n3g
.ﬁ4n3g
.f2in1i
.fi5n4it
.ﬁn1i
.ﬁ5n4it
.fi2s4c5
.ﬁ2s4c5
.1fo
.3f2o3c
.1fr2
.fra2n
.fran5ch
.3fu
.fu5g4a
.g2a4m
.gam2e
.ga1m5e2t
.3gen
.g4ene
.gen4et
.ge5neti
.gen1i
.gen5i1a2
.ger1
.ge3ro
.2gl2
.3glo
.glor1i
.glor5i3o2
.2gn2
.g2no
.gno4s
.gnost4
.go3no
.3gos3
.ha2
.h1ab2
.hab1il
.ha5bili
.h2a4m
.hama5
.ha2n
.ha4nd
.han4de2
.hast2
.hast5i
.he2
.h4e4i
.hem5a
.hi2
.hi3b
.ho2l
.ho5rol
.hov3
.h2y
.hy2l
.hy3lo
.2i2c2o2
.ico3s
.i2d
.idi2
.2ig3
.i2g1n2
.il4i
.i2m5b
.in1
.2i4n3d
.in3e2
.2in2i
.2in3o
.in3t
.in3v2
.inve2
.invest2
.inve2st5i
.2ir
.i4r3r4
.i2s4c2
.i2s1l4
.is4li
.is4o
.i1s2o5m
.ka2r
.ka5ro
.ki4e2
.k1in
.kin3e
.l2a
.l1ab
.lab4o2
.l2a2m
.la4m2e
.la3men
.lam5enta
.la2n
.lan5i
.l4as
.las2h
.lash4e2
.le4m
.len5t2i
.le2p
.le1p5r2
.3le4s4s
.les2so
.les5son
.2lev
.l3eva
.le5va2n
.lib1r4
.libra2r5
.1l2ig
.lig3a
.l2i3o2
.li4o4n1s2
.l2i4p
.1l2oc
.loc3a
.1l2o1g
.lo3g2i
.lo4g2i1a2
.lo2p
.loph3
.lo4u2
.lous5i
.lov5er1
.lub3
.2ly
.ly1o3
.mac5u
.mal2a
.mal5ad5
.ma5l1in
.1ma2r
.mart2
.mar5ti
.m4a2th5
.m2e
.melo4di
.me5lo3d2i1o2
.1men
.ment4
.men5ta
.mer1
.me5r2i2d
.me5r3in
.1me2t
.met1e
.met4er2
.mi4e2
.m2ig
.mi3gr2
.m2in2u
.min5ue
.m2ir
.mir2k4
.mis1
.mi2t
.mi5to
.1mo
.mo3b2i
.mo5le2c4
.m4on
.mon3a4
.m2ort2
.mor5ti
.mun1
.mu3n2i
.mu3si
.mus2i5c2o2
.2my
.3myt
.myth3
.n1a
.n2a5k2
.na2r
.nar1i4
.n2as
.nast4
.nas5ti
.ne2c3t
.n1i
.ni4c
.n2itr2
.ni5tro
.n2o4c
.n2om
.no2m3o
.nos3t2
.n2ot
.no5t1ic
.n2u
.5n4uc
.nuc3l2
.nuc2le5
.ob2e
.o2b2ed5
.o1b3e4l
.o2b3l2
.od4
.o2e4d5
.oe5so
.o2f5t
.2oi4
.ol4d
.2om
.om2e2
.om5el
.on1c
.on4ce
.o2n4e
.op2i
.1o2p1t2
.op2t5a
.or1
.or1a
.or4at4
.ora2to
.orat1or5
.ora5tor1i
.or1c2
.or4ch
.or5che2
.or3d
.2or2e4
.or3eo
.or4i
.or2n2
.orn1er4
.or2o
.os1
.osi4
.2ot
.4oth5
.o4u2
.out1
.ov4
.pal5i
.1pa2r
.par2ad
.para5di4s1
.par5af
.par5a2ﬀ
.par5aﬁ
.par5aﬂ2
.par1a5t
.p2a5ta
.pa4t2io2
.pe2c3t4
.pecu3
.2p2ed
.3ped3e2
.p2e4nd4
.pen5de2
.pe2p3t2
.per1
.p4eri
.per3i5n
.pe2r1s2
.per2se
.per3se5c
.3pet
.pe2ti
.pe5titi
.ph2
.phe4
.phen1o
.phe5n2o2m
.1pho
.ph2o4n
.phon4i
.p2i2e2
.p2il
.pi3l3a
.p2l2
.1pl2a
.pl4as
.plast4
.plic4
.plica4
.plos4
.1po
.po3l2a
.pol2it
.po5lite
.po2p
.p4op5l2
.3p4os
.pos1it
.po5si1t2io2
.po4s1s2
.pos5si
.1pr2
.pr4oba
.pro5bat
.pu4r
.pu4r4r4
.pu2t1t4
.put4te
.ra5cem
.ra2n
.ra4ng
.ran5g2i
.r2e
.re3c2a
.re1f
.re2fe
.refer1
.r2ef5er2e
.re2ﬀ
.re1ﬁ
.re1ﬂ2
.re5ga2r
.re1i4
.re5lin
.re1m
.re5o
.re2sc2
.res5c2i2
.re5sen
.re5s2po
.rest2
.re5stat
.rest1or
.r2e5s4t2or2e
.re5st4r2
.re3t2a
.re5u
.re3w
.2r2ib
.rib5a
.rin4
.rit2
.roll2
.rol4l2a
.r4os3a
.sa2
.sac5r2
.sa2l
.sal4i
.sa5l1in
.s4al4t
.sal1te
.salt5er1
.sa2n
.sanc5
.s3ap
.s4ap5a
.s2av
.sa3vo
.sc2
.s1c2i2
.sci3e2
.se2a2
.sea3s4
.se2ct4
.sec5to
.se3gr2
.sen3t
.se1q
.ser1
.ser4ie2
.s2es1
.3sev
.sever1
.sev5era
.s2h2
.s2i4g
.si2gn2
.si5g2no
.s1is3
.st4
.sta2t4o
.str2
.stra5to
.stri4ng
.str4in2g5i
.su5d4a
.1s2ul
.sulph2
.sulph5a2
.sul3t
.ta2ct
.tact4i
.tac5t2ic
.t2a4m
.ta1ma2r5
.ta2r
.tar5o
.te2ct4
.te2l
.tel5a
.1tell2
.tell5e
.te4m
.ter1
.te5ra5t
.ter4p
.th4
.tho4
.thol4
.ti2
.til4
.t1in
.t2i5n1i
.t3i2t4is
.t1or1
.tr2
.tra2n
.tran4c
.t2r2ib
.tri5bal
.tri3d
.trin4a
.trist2
.t4ri5sti
.tr2op
.tro4ph
.tro1ph5o
.tro4v
.tu1l2a
.tula2r5
.tu4r
.tur1b4
.tur1i4
.1tut
.tu5te
.tu3t2o
.4ul4l2
.ul1tim
.ultim4a
.ulti5mat
.un1
.un5ce
.un5ch
.u4n3d2
.unde2
.under5
.un3e
.u4n3g
.un2i
.u1ni3c
.un2i3o2
.u4n3k4
.u4n5s4
.un3t4
.un5u4
.2up1
.up3l2
.u4r
.ur1a4
.ur2e
.ur1e2t
.ur5e2th1
.ur4o
.1v2ale
.va5l2ed
.ve2
.vec5
.2vel
.ve5lo
.vent2i
.vent5il
.ver1
.v5er4ie2
.ver3n2
.vic2
.5vi2ct2
.vic5to
.vi2s
.vis3i
.vi5so
.1vo
.v2o1c
.vo2l
.vo5lut
.wi2
.win2e
.wine5s
.xy3l
.z1a1
.za5r
a4a
1ab
2ab.
2aba
aba2r
ab5ar2e
ab4ay4
2a2b1b2
abb2e
ab5ber1
2ab2e4
aber1
ab3erd
a5b3e4r1r4
a3bet
ab1ic
a3b4ie2
2abin
4a1b2i2o2
abi5on
ab3it1a
ab4itu
a2bl2
ab3l2a
abli4
abo2
abol3i
4abolic
ab3om
ab2ot
ab3ota
abo4u2
3about
ab1r4
a4b1s2
2abs.
ab1ul
abu4lo
ab3use
ab3usi
2a2by
ac2a
ac1ab
ac5a2bl2
ac3al
aca2n
5ac1anth2
a1ca2r
ac5ard
a5c1at
a2ch
acha2
ach5al
ach1in
a5ch2in1i
ach5i2s1m4
a3c2hr
achro4
ach5u4r4
2a1c2i2
a4cic
acie2
aci3er1
aci4e2r1s2
ac2i3f4
ac2i3ﬀ
ac2i3ﬁ4
ac4i3ﬂ2
4acit
ack1
ack5a
acl2
ac3li
a1c2o2
4a4co.
aco3d
acon1
ac5on1r
4acos
4aco4u2
ac1r2
ac3r2y2
a2ct
ac2ta
act5ate
act5ile
ac2to
act1or
act5o2r2y
ac2t5r2
ac2ua2
ac5uat
a5d2ai2
a3d2a3v
4adee
ad5en1i
a4d1h
ad4ha2
ad3ica
a5d2i1f
a5d2i2ﬀ
a5d2i1ﬁ
a5d4i2ﬂ2
4adil4
a3d2i1o2
adi4op
ad2i4p
adi4s1
adis4i
a3diti
ad1j
3adju
a2d1m
5admi2t
a2do
4adoe
4ad2oi
ad3ol
a3d4os
ad1ow
ad1r2
a3dr2a2m4
4a2du
ad3u1l2a
ad3um
4a2d2y
ae5a2
ae1c2i2
ae4cit
ae1c2o3
4a2ed
aed5i4s1
ae5g
ae3on
ae5p
aer1
aer2od
aero2d2y5
ae4s
ae5si
aes3t2
aet4a
ae2th4
aet1or
aet4or.
aev3a
4af.
4afe
a2ft
af5ta
a4fu
aga2r
ag4ar1i
ager1
4ageri
a2gh
a5ghe2
a1g2i
a5g2i1a2
agi4as
4ag2ino
4a2gl2
agli4
4a2g1n2
ag3on1i
agor4a
ag5ot
a2gr2
ag3ri
a3gru5
2ah
a1h2a2
aha2r2
aha5r1a
a1he2
a2h4n2
a5h2oo
2ai2
4ai.
a2i3a2
a1ic
ai2d
aid4a
aid5er1
a2ig2
ai5gu
ai2l3er1
ail3o
aim2e
aim5er1
a2i4nd
ainde2
ainder1
ain5de2r3s2
a4i5nea2
ai4ng
a3ing.
a2in3i
a2in5o
ain1te
aint5er1
a2ir
air5a
air5p
ai2r3s2
ais1i
a5i2s1m4
2a1j
a4ju
2ak
akel4
ak5u
al2a
al1ab
al5a2bl2
al4ac
ala2ct4
a1l4ae
al2ai2
al5ais
al2a2m
ala3ma
ala2n
al5ance
al3at
a5l2av
al1c2
al2c3at
al3ch
aldr2
ald5ri
2ale
a3lec
aleg4
ale5ma
al2e4nd
al5end4e2
a1leo
a2let
al3ib1r4
ali4c2i2
al5i4c5s4
al1i2d
al3i1f
al3i2ﬀ
al3i1ﬁ
al4i2ﬂ2
5a1l2ig
al1in
a5l2in1i
al2in5o
al2ip
al5ipe
ali3po
al5ip2ot
al1is
4alis.
4al2i1u2
4alk
alk5ie2
all2
al1l2a
al4l1ab
al4lag
al1li
all2i1a2
alli5a2n
al1l2ig4
all1is
al4lis2h
a5loe
a1l2o1g
al3o1gr2
a3l2om
a3l2oo
al1or
alor1i
al4orim
alos4
a4lo4u2
al3ous
a5low
al5pen
al3ph2
al5tati
al3tie2
alu3b
a4lue
al5u4ed
al3ues
alu4m1n2
alumn1i
a5lumn2i1a2
al1va
al5ver1
alv5u
2a2ly4
a5lyn1
2a2m
a5mad
ama4g
a1ma2n
ama4n5d
a1ma2r
amar1i
a5marin4e
a3mas.
am1at
a5m4at1i2c
am5a2tu
a2m1b
amb2i
am4bin
3ambu
am2e
am5elo
a3men
am2e4n4d
amer1
am3era
am5erl
am1i
am1i2c
am5ica
am2i1c5r2
3ami2d
am2il
a3mili
am5i2ly
am2in1i
amin2i4f
amin2i4ﬀ
amin2i4ﬁ
amin4i4ﬂ2
am5in1iz
am2ino
am4inos4
a5m2is.
a3m2i1u2
ami3um
a4mium.
a1mo
a3m4on
amor5a
am2ort3
am5ose
am2p
amper1
am5p4er3i
amph2i5g
amp2l2
amp3li
am3po
ampo5l
am3ul
a2my
amyl5
a2n
an2a
a5nadi4
an3ae
an3age
an2a5k2
an3ali
ana2r
an3ar1c2
an2as
a5nast2
an1c2o2
an4con1
a4nd
an2da
an3d4at
and5au2
ande2
and5eer1
an5de4l
an5d2i1f
an5d2i2ﬀ
an5d2i1ﬁ
an5d4i2ﬂ2
andi4s1
and5ist2
an5dit
an1do
an4don1i
an4ea2
an5eer1
an3ell2
anel5li
an3eu
a4ng
ang2a
a2n3ga2n
an1go
angov4
an1gu
an4gu4r
4an1h2
an1i
an3ic
an2i3f
an2i3ﬀ
an2i3ﬁ
an4i3ﬂ2
an5i3fo
4an2i2g
an2io2
an5ion
anist2
anis5te2
4anity
4an2i1u2
an1n4
an5no
4an2ny2
an1o
an2oe
an2om
an3o1ma
anor3
an2os
an5ot
a4n2s
an3s2c2
an4s2c2o2
an2si
ans3il
an3su
an4su4r
an2t2a
an2t1ab
ant5a2bl2
an3t1al
an5t2a2m
an2te
1anth2
an4thi
3an1t2h2r
ant2i
4ant1ic
an4tie2
ant1in
an4t3i4ng
an2t4iv
an1t2o
an4to2n4e
an1t4r2
an1tu
an4tus
an2ty
an5tym
an2u
an3ul
an3um.
an5u4m1s
a3nu4r
a5nut
a2n2y2
an5y1a2
a5ny1i
2ao
aol3i
5aow
2ap
4ap.
4apa
a1pac
ap3al
a1pa2r
ap5aro
ape5li
a5peu
aphe4
aph5em
aph3i
a1pho
aph5ol
aph2y
a3phy2l3
ap1i
ap5icu
ap3in
ap4in4e
a5p2ir
ap2l2
a1pl2a
a3pla2n
ap5li
a1po
a3p4os
apost2
apo5str2
ap2ot
ap4o3th
a2pr2
ap5ron
4a2ps2
a2pt2
apt5at
apu1l2a
apu5la2r
a5p4un1
a4q
aqu4
a5q2ui2
a2r
ar1ab
4arabi
ar2a5bo2
ara2ct
aract4i
ara2g
ar3age
ar4a2g2e4d
ar5a1g2i
ar3ago
a3r2a1j
ar3all2
ar2a3m
ara2n
ara4n4g
aran2t
aran5te
ar2ap
ar5apa
ar1at
a3r2au2
ar2a3v
ar1b
ar3ba
ar2b2e
arb5et
arb2i
ar4b2i2d
ar4bl2
arb3li
ar4bul
ar1c2
ar2ch
arche2
ar5chet1
ar1ch5o
ar2d2in
ar5din1a
ar1do
ar4do2ne
ar2e
ar3en
ar2e4n5d
ar5e2t2t4
ar3e1v5
ar1g2
ar5gh
ar3gu
ar3h2
ar1i
ar2i1f
ar5i2ff
ar2i2ﬀ
ar2i1ﬁ
ar4i2ﬂ2
ar4ill2
arin4e
a5r4i5net
ar5in1i
aris2h
a5rishi
arm2e
arm3er1
ar5mi2t
ar2n2
arn1a
ar3nal
arn1i
ar3nis
ar3od
a4r2oi
ar5o2i4d3
ar2om
aro1ma
aro4mas
aro4n
ar2ot
a5roti
aro4u2
a5ro4uc
a4r3o4x
arpe2
arper1
arp5e2r1s2
ar4pu
2a4r1r4
ar2rh2
a2r2s2
ar2s5a2l
ar3so
art2
art5at
ar2th
arth4e2
ar1t2h3r
ar5t1iz
2aru
ar3um
ar5un4
a2r2y
a3ry1o2
a5ry2t
ar5z
as1a
as4af
as4a2ﬀ
as4aﬁ
as4aﬂ2
asa2n2
2asc2
as2c2o2
as5con1
as5c2ot
as2cr2
as2e
as3e2ct
4a2s2ed
ase2p4
as2h
asha2
ash5ay
ash5i4l
as5i2ly
a2s3in
a5s2io4
a3s1it
a4s5iv
as2k2
aske2
ask5er1
aski4
a2sl4
as4l2a
as4lo
2aso
as2oc
as5o2ch
as4o2ne
a4s4o2n2ed
as5or
as3ph2
a4ss2
as1sa
assa4g
assa5g2i
as4s1ib
ass5i2bl2
as4sil
as3s2it5
ast2
2asta
as4tat
as4t2i3a2
as3t1is
as4tit
4asto2
astr2
as3tra
as4tri
as1u
as4un1
as5u4r
2a2ta
a2t1ab
4atabi
a5tal1is
at2a2m4
at2a3p
ata2r
atar3a
ata3s
ata3t4
atea2
at3e2au3
at3e2ch
at5eer1
ate2l
a5tel.
at2e5le
aten1a
at5enat
at3ent
4ater1
at3era
ater2n2
atern1i
at5er1n3is
at5ern3iz
a2t2es
4ate4ss
at5et
4a2th
ath3a4
athe2
a3then
at4her1
ath5er3in
ath5ero
athet1
ath5ete
ath3i
ath3od
a5th2o4n
a1t2h5r
4a3t2i2a2
at1i2c
at2i1c2i2
at5icis
ati5cit
at5ic1iz
a2t2i1f2
a4t2i2ﬀ
a2t2i1ﬁ
a2t4i2ﬂ2
a4t1i4l
a4tim
a2t3in
4atin1a
at5i4ng
a2t1is
4at4is.
at1it
atit3u
atitud5i
4a3t2i1u2
a2t1iv
at4ivi
a5tiv1iz
a2to
5at5od
4a1t2o1g
2atol
4aton
a3t2oo
a4to2ps2
at1or
ator1i
ator2i1a2
a5t4oria2n
a4to2r2y
atos4
a5t2oz
2a2tr2
at3ra
a4tr2e
5at5re4s4s
at1ri
a3t2r2ic5u
at3ron
at5ro4u2
a2t1t4
atta4
at4tag
2a2tu
at1ul
atu4m
atu4r
at3ur1a
at3ur1g2
4a2ty
2au2
4au.
au1b5i
4a4uc
au5cer1
au1c3o2
aud4e
au4d5er1
audic4
aul3i
aul4t
aul1te
aul5t4ed
ault5er1
ault5i
au3ma
aun2
aun2ch
aun5ch4ie2
au4n3d
aundr2
aun4dr2e
au4r
aur2e
au5reo
aur4o
au5ror
4aus.
aus5er1
aus5p
